src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection

Nenets nouns inflect in cases.

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 
* **LEXICON N_ҢЭ** ңэ:ңэ 1  ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **xo, ngaeTS**
**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

* **LEXICON N_ҢЭ-Pal/Var** ңэ:ңэ 1  ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **nyeTS**

* **LEXICON N_Ё** я:я 2 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **ya, yaTS**

* **LEXICON N_ПИ** пя:пя 3 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **N-pyaTS**

* **LEXICON N_ТЫ** ты: 4 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **tyTS**

* **LEXICON N_ХАВО** ха: 5 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **tyTS**

* **LEXICON N_СЁЁ** сё: 6 ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ИБЕ** и: 7 ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ХАБИЕ** хӑби:8ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ПАНЫ** пӑны:пӑн 9 ы!ProsSg -(э)вна

* **LEXICON N_ХУСУВЭЙ** хусувэй: 10 ProsSg -ювна

* **LEXICON N_ХАНО** хӑн: 11P ProsSg -увна
Yaml: **xano**

* **LEXICON N_ТИРЕ** тир: 12 ProsSg -увна

* **LEXICON N_ЕД** ед: 13 ProsSg -увна /-ювна

* **LEXICON N_МАРАҢГЫ** мӑраңга: 14PProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ҢУДИ** ңуда: 15 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **N-ngudiTS**

* **LEXICON N_ЕСИ** ая̆ха: 16PProsSg -вна
Yaml: **N-yaxaTS**

* **LEXICON N_ҢОДИ** ңодя: 17 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **N-ngodiTS**

* **LEXICON N_ЯЛЭ** яля: 18 ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ХОБ** хоба:хоба 19 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **xob**

* **LEXICON N_ТЁН** тёня:тёня 20 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **tyon**

* **LEXICON N_ПИСЬ** пися: 21 ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ХАСЕВ** хасава: 22 ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ҢАНУ** ңӑно: 23 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **nano**

* **LEXICON N_ЯКЫ** якэ: 24 ProsSg -вна

* **LEXICON N_ҢУВО** ңумʼ:ңум 25 ProsSg -(м)на
Yaml: **yam, ngumhTS**

* **LEXICON N_НЮБЕ** нюмʼ: 26  ProsSg -(м)на

* **LEXICON N_МУНО** муʼ:му 27  ProsSg -мна

* **LEXICON N_ПОЁ** поʼ:по 28  ProsSg -мна
Yaml: **poyo**

* **LEXICON N_ВЫҢО** выʼ:вы 29  ProsSg -мна /-мана

* **LEXICON N_ИЛЪЕ** илʼ:ил 30   ProsSg -мана
Yaml: **ilje**
| --- 

* **LEXICON N_НЕНЭЦИЕ** ненэцьʼ:ненэць 30   ProsSg -мана
Yaml: **nyenecyh**
| --- 

* **LEXICON N_ПАХАЁ** пӑхӑʼ: 31   ProsSg -мна
| --- 

* **LEXICON N_СЕРО** серˮ: 32   ProsSg -мана / -мня

* **LEXICON N_ТАРЕ** тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
| --- 

* **LEXICON N_МАНСО** мӑнˮ: 34   ProsSg -мна

* **LEXICON N_МЯДО** мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
Yaml: **myadoTS**
| --- 

* **LEXICON N_ИДЕ** иˮ: 36   ProsSg -мна
Yaml: **yidye**

* **LEXICON N_ҢЭ/ХАБИЕ** ңэ:ңэ 1  ProsSg -вна
хӑби:8 ProsSg -вна

та:та 

* **LEXICON NMN_ҢУДИ** ңуда: 15 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **ngudi**
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_ҢОДИ**
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_ХОБ** хоба:хоба 19 ProsSg -вна
Yaml: **xob**
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_ПИСЬ** пися: 21 ProsSg -вна
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_ҢАНУ** ңӑно: 23 ProsSg -вна
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_ҢУВО** ңумʼ:ңум 25 
* **:ʼ POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_НЮБЕ** нюмʼ: 26

* **LEXICON NMN_МУНО** муʼ: 27  ProsSg -мна

No n2d

* **:%{йнңъʼØ%} SGNOMSUF ;** 
* **:%{йнңъʼØ%} SG-NOM-STEM ;** 
* **:%{йнңъʼØ%} POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

Where is the variation?

* **LEXICON NMN_ТАРЕ** тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня

* **LEXICON N_ВАР/ТАРЕ** мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна

* **LEXICON NMN_ВАР** мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
Yaml: **waro**
* **:%{дˮØ%} POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_МЯДО** мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
Yaml: **myado**
* **:%{дˮØ%} SGLOCSUF_Хна ;** мякна
* **:%{дˮØ%} POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

Where is the variation?

Where is the variation?
* **:%{дˮØ%} POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON N_ТЮСЕ** тюˮ:тюсе 

* **LEXICON N_САВНЕ** 

* **LEXICON N_ПЕНЗЕРЕ** пензерˮ:пензер

* **LEXICON N_САБЦЬ** сабць:сабць

* **LEXICON N_МЕРЁ** мерё:мерё

NMN

* **LEXICON NMN_ҢЭ-OLD** ңэ:ңэ 1  ProsSg -вна
* **SG-ACC-STEM ;** SGACCSUF, SGGENSUF
* **SG-NOM-STEM ;** SG/DAT,LOC, ABL,TRA,PRO; DU/NOM,ACC,GEN; PL/DAT,LOC,ABL,TRA; PX-s, NOMINAL-CONJUGATION
* **PLNOMSUF ;** 
* **PLACCSUF_Zero ;** => PL-ACC_STEM
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

9
* **:%^VowLower POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ** хусувэй: 10 ProsSg -ювна
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* LEXICON NMN_ХАНО-OLD  11 хан:хан

* **LEXICON NMN_ТИРЕ** тир: 12 ProsSg -увна
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

* **LEXICON NMN_ЕД** ед: 13 ProsSg -увна /-ювна
Yaml: **yed**
* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

## NOMINALS "NMN"
### THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS

* **POSSESSA-PLURAL ;** +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

таˮ:та

варˮ:вар
Yaml: **N-tarTS**
| --- 

The singular accusative stem

* **LEXICON SGLOCSUF_Хна** мякна

* **LEXICON SGLOCSUF_Хана** серкана

Start Plural

What is assumed on the basis of the plural accusative
* **+Pl+Pros:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2на K ;** When does this take a vowel хоˮомна

Possessor Indices

* **+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScSg3:%>в K ;** 2013-10-22 Should this also have +ScSg3 marking

* **LEXICON AFTER-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-COME-POSSESSOR-INDICES ** singular possessa in +Gen, +Dat, +Loc, +Abl share the same possessor indices

* **LEXICON DV-OBLIQUE-SG-POSSESSA-TAKE-POSSESSOR-INDICES_TO-BE-FOLLOWED-BY-SG3-PRED-AOR/PRT1 ** singular possessa oblique possessor indices

SINUGLAR CASES

The next line in +Sg+Pros+PxDu2:%>%{увм%}А2нандиʼ must be removed

Dual possessa

Dual possessa

Plural Possessa

* **+PxPl1:наˮ K ; ** The morpheme boundary has been removed to indicate a distinct difference in phonological behavior.

Conjugation of nouns and adjectives

## NEW

>>NEW-SG-LOC_Кна/Кана

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-yrk/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
